North Carolina, session 2025, SB355.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
PART I. COMMUNITY SUPERVISION
WAIVE TUITION FOR SURVIVORS OF FALLEN PROBATION OFFICERS
SECTION 1.1.(a) G.S. 115B-1 reads as rewritten:
"§ 115B-1. Definitions.
The following definitions apply in this Chapter:
…
(4) Permanently and totally disabled as a direct result of a traumatic injury
sustained in the line of duty. – A person: (i) who as a law enforcement officer,
correctional officer, probation officer, firefighter, volunteer firefighter, or
rescue squad worker suffered a disabling injury while in active service or
training for active service, (ii) who at the time of active service or training was
a North Carolina resident, and (iii) who has been determined to be
permanently and totally disabled for compensation purposes by the North
Carolina Industrial Commission.
(4c) Probation officer. – An employee of an employer who is certified as a
probation officer under the provisions of Article 1 of Chapter 17C of the
General Statutes.
…
(6) Survivor. – Any person whose parent, legal guardian, legal custodian, or
spouse: (i) was a law enforcement officer, a correctional officer, a probation
officer, a firefighter, a volunteer firefighter, or a rescue squad worker, (ii) was
killed while in active service or training for active service or died as a result
of a service-connected disability, and (iii) at the time of active service or
training was a North Carolina resident. The term does not include the widow
or widower of a law enforcement officer, correctional officer, probation
officer, firefighter, volunteer firefighter, or a rescue squad worker if the
widow or widower has remarried.
…."
SECTION 1.1.(b) G.S. 115B-2(a) reads as rewritten:
"(a) The constituent institutions of The University of North Carolina and the community
colleges as defined in G.S. 115D-2(2) shall permit the following persons to attend classes for
credit or noncredit purposes without the required payment of tuition:
…
(2) Any person who is the survivor of a law enforcement officer, correctional
officer, probation officer, firefighter, volunteer firefighter, or rescue squad
worker killed as a direct result of a traumatic injury sustained in the line of
duty.
*S355-v-8*

(3) The spouse of a law enforcement officer, correctional officer, probation
officer, firefighter, volunteer firefighter, or rescue squad worker who is
permanently and totally disabled as a direct result of a traumatic injury
sustained in the line of duty.
(4) Any child, if the child is at least 17 years old but not yet 24 years old, whose
parent, legal guardian, or legal custodian is a law enforcement officer,
correctional officer, probation officer, firefighter, volunteer firefighter, or
rescue squad worker who is permanently and totally disabled as a direct result
of a traumatic injury sustained in the line of duty. However, a child's eligibility
for a waiver of tuition under this Chapter shall not exceed: (i) 54 months, if
the child is seeking a baccalaureate degree, or (ii) if the child is not seeking a
baccalaureate degree, the number of months required to complete the
educational program to which the child is applying.
…."
SECTION 1.1.(c) G.S. 115B-5(b) reads as rewritten:
"(b) The officials of the institutions charged with administration of this Chapter shall
require the following proof to insure that a person applying to the institution and who requests a
tuition waiver under G.S. 115B-2(a)(2), (3), or (4) is eligible for the benefits provided by this
Chapter.
…
(3) The cause of death of the law enforcement officer, correctional officer,
probation officer, firefighter, volunteer firefighter, or rescue squad worker
shall be verified by certification from the records of the Department of State
Treasurer, the appropriate city or county law enforcement agency that
employed the deceased, the administrative agency for the fire department or
fire protection district recognized for funding under the Department of State
Auditor, or the administrative agency having jurisdiction over any paid
firefighters of all counties and cities.
…."
SECTION 1.1.(d) This section is effective when it becomes law and applies to
waivers of tuition granted on or after that date.
MODIFY TECHNICAL REQUIREMENTS FOR ELECTRONIC
MONITORING/SATELLITE-BASED MONITORING
SECTION 1.2.(a) G.S. 15A-101.1 reads as rewritten:
"§ 15A-101.1. Electronic technology in criminal process and procedure.
As used in this Chapter, in Chapter 7A of the General Statutes, in Chapter 15 of the General
Statutes, and in all other provisions of the General Statutes that deal with criminal process or
procedure:procedure, the following definitions shall apply:
(1) "Attach" or "attached" means, when Attach or attached. – When referring to
documents existing in paper form, physical attachment by staples, clips, or
other mechanical means, or managed such that neither document is stored or
delivered without the other. When referring to documents stored in electronic
form, the term means either storage as a single digital file or storage in a
manner that a user interface for access to the documents displays clearly the
logical association between them, to the exclusion of other, unassociated
documents displayed with them. When referring to documents delivered in
electronic form, the term means documents delivered simultaneously and via
the same mechanism or medium, including, but not limited to, any of the
following: (i) delivery via a single email message, (ii) delivery on a single unit
of removable electronic media, or (iii) delivery in immediate,
Page 2 Session Law 2026-44 Senate Bill 355

contemporaneous sequence with one another from the same source to the same
recipient. It is not necessary that the relationship between documents appear
on the face of the documents in order to be deemed attached.
(1a) "Copy" means all Copy. – All identical versions of a document created or
existing in paper or electronic form, including the original and all other
identical versions of the document. Except where otherwise expressly
provided by law or when authority is vested only in a certified copy, a copy
of a document is equally authoritative as the original.
(2) "Document" means any Document. – Any pleading, criminal process,
subpoena, complaint, motion, application, notice, affidavit, commission,
waiver, consent, dismissal, order, judgment, or other writing intended in a
criminal or contempt proceeding to authorize or require an action, to record a
decision or to communicate or record information. A document may be
created and exist in paper form or in electronic form or in both forms. Each
document shall contain the legible, printed name of the person who signed the
document.
(3) "Electronic" means relating Electronic. – Relating to technology having
electrical, digital, magnetic, wireless, optical, electromagnetic, Internet, or
similar capabilities.
(3a) "Electronic monitoring" or "electronically monitor" or "satellite-based
monitoring" means monitoring Electronic monitoring or electronically
monitor or satellite-based monitoring. – Monitoring with an electronic
monitoring device that is not removed from a person's body, that is utilized by
the supervising agency in conjunction with a Web-based computer system that
actively monitors, identifies, tracks, and records a person's location at least
once every minute 24 hours a day, that has a battery life of at least 48 hours
without being recharged, that timely records and reports or records the
person's presence near or within a crime scene or prohibited area or the
person's departure from a specified geographic location, and that has
incorporated into the software the ability to automatically compare crime
scene data with locations of all persons being electronically monitored so as
to provide any correlation daily or in real time. In areas of the State where lack
of cellular coverage requires the use of an alternative device, the supervising
agency shall use an alternative device that works in concert with the software
and records location and tracking data for later download and crime scene
comparison.
(4) "Electronic Repository" means an Electronic repository. – An automated
electronic repository for criminal process created and maintained pursuant to
G.S. 15A-301.1.
…
(6) "Entered" means signed Entered. – Signed and filed in the office of the clerk
of superior court of the county in which the document is to be entered. A
document may be entered in either paper form or electronic form.
(7) "Filing" or "filed" means:Filing or filed. –
…
(8) "Issued" applies Issued. – Applies to documents in either paper form or
electronic form. A document that is first created in paper form is issued when
it is signed. A document that is first created in electronic form is issued when
it is signed and filed in the office of the clerk of superior court of the county
for which it is to be issued.
(9) "Original" means:Original. –
Senate Bill 355 Session Law 2026-44 Page 3

…
(10) "Signature" means any Signature. – Any symbol, including, but not limited to,
the name of an individual, which is executed by that individual, personally or
through an authorized agent, with the intent to authenticate or to effect the
issuance or entry of a document. A document may be signed by the use of any
manual, mechanical mechanical, or electronic means that causes the
individual's signature to appear in or on the document. Any party challenging
the validity of a signature shall have the burden of pleading, producing
evidence, and proving that the signature was not the act of the person whose
signature it appears to be."
SECTION 1.2.(b) This section is effective when it becomes law and applies to an
electronic monitoring device used on or after that date.
MODIFICATION OF POST-RELEASE SUPERVISION REQUIREMENTS
SECTION 1.3.(a) G.S. 143B-1491(d) reads as rewritten:
"(d) The granting, denying, revoking, or rescinding of parole, the authorization of
work-release privileges to a prisoner, or any other matters of business coming before the
Commission for consideration and action shall be decided by majority vote of the full
Commission, except that a three-member panel of the Commission may set the terms and
conditions for a post-release supervisee under G.S. 15A-1368.4 and may decide questions of
violations thereunder, violations, including the issuance of warrants. warrants, and may decide
questions of parole under G.S. 20-179(p). Any single member of the Commission may set and
modify the terms and conditions for a post-release supervisee under G.S. 15A-1368.4, may
authorize the issuance of a letter of reprimand, and may continue an offender's supervision. In
the event of a tie in a vote by the full Commission, the chair shall break the tie with an additional
vote."
SECTION 1.3.(b) This section is effective when it becomes law and applies to
actions taken by the Commission on or after that date.
PART II. INSTITUTIONS
SEXUALLY VIOLENT PREDATOR DETERMINATIONS
SECTION 2.1.(a) G.S. 14-208.20(b) reads as rewritten:
"(b) Prior to sentencing a person as a sexually violent predator, the court shall order a
presentence investigation in accordance with G.S. 15A-1332(c). However, the study of the
defendant and whether the defendant is a sexually violent predator shall be conducted by a board
of experts selected by the Division of Prisons of the Department of Adult Correction. The board
of experts shall be composed of at least four people. Two of the board members shall be experts
in the field of the behavior and treatment of sexual offenders, one of whom shall be selected from
a panel of experts in those fields provided by the North Carolina Medical Society and not be
employed full-time with the Division of Prisons of the Department of Adult Correction or
employed on a full-time basis with any other State agency. One of the board members shall be a
victims' rights advocate, and one of the board members shall be a representative of law
enforcement agencies."
SECTION 2.1.(b) This section becomes effective December 1, 2026, and applies to
boards of experts selected on or after that date.
INCREASE LIMIT ON PURCHASES FROM CORRECTION ENTERPRISES
SECTION 2.2. G.S. 148-132 reads as rewritten:
"§ 148-132. Distribution of products and services.
Page 4 Session Law 2026-44 Senate Bill 355

The Division of Correction Enterprises of the Department of Adult Correction is empowered
and authorized to market and sell products and services produced by Correction Enterprises to
any of the following entities:
…
(5) Any current employee or retiree of the State of North Carolina, member,
employee, or retiree of the North Carolina National Guard, or of a unit of local
government of this State, verified through federal or State-issued
identification, or through proof of retirement status, but purchases by a State
employee or retiree, National Guard member, employee, or retiree, or local
governmental employee or retiree may not exceed two thousand five hundred
dollars ($2,500) four thousand dollars ($4,000) during any calendar year.
Products purchased by State employees or retirees, National Guard members,
employees or retirees, and local governmental employees and retirees under
this section may not be resold.
…."
AUTHORIZE SUBSTANCE ABUSE ASSESSMENTS AND ADETS BY DAC
SECTION 2.3.(a) G.S. 122C-3 reads as rewritten:
"§ 122C-3. Definitions.
The following definitions apply in this Chapter:
…
(14) Facility. – Any person at one location, or in the case of an opioid treatment
program facility licensed to operate an opioid treatment program medication
unit, an opioid treatment program mobile unit, or both, any person at one or
more locations, whose primary purpose is to provide services for the care,
treatment, habilitation, or rehabilitation of individuals with mental illnesses or
intellectual or other developmental disabilities or substance abusers, and
includes all of the following:
…
j. Any facility operated by the Department of Adult Correction that
provides alcohol and drug education traffic school or substance abuse
assessments under G.S. 122C-142.1.
…."
SECTION 2.3.(b) G.S. 122C-142.1 reads as rewritten:
"§ 122C-142.1. Substance abuse services for those convicted of driving while impaired or
driving while less than 21 years old after consuming alcohol or drugs.
(a) Services. – An area authority shall provide, directly or by contract, the substance
abuse services needed by a person to obtain a certificate of completion required under
G.S. 20-17.6 as a condition for the restoration of a drivers license. A person may obtain the
required services from an area facility, from a private facility authorized by the Department to
provide this service, or, with the approval of the Department, from an agency that is located in
another state. An eligible person housed in a facility operated by the Department of Adult
Correction may obtain the required services from the Department of Adult Correction.
…
(a2) Authorization of Department of Adult Correction. – The Department shall authorize
approved facilities operated by the Department of Adult Correction to provide substance abuse
services needed to obtain a certificate of completion to a person housed in that facility if all of
the following requirements are met:
(1) The Department of Adult Correction notifies the Department of the designated
facilities which may provide the services.
Senate Bill 355 Session Law 2026-44 Page 5

(2) Assessments and alcohol and drug education traffic (ADET) school provided
by the Department of Adult Correction under this subsection comply with
rules adopted under the North Carolina Administrative Code, including
placement criteria, documentation, and reporting requirements, and adhere to
Department of Adult Correction security and custody policies.
(3) No fee, tuition, or charge is imposed upon an individual for an assessment or
ADET school provided directly by the Department of Adult Correction
pursuant to this subsection. The Department of Adult Correction shall be
responsible for any costs associated with purchasing required curriculum
materials.
(4) Services delivered by the Department of Adult Correction under this
subsection are exempt from licensure under Article 2 of this Chapter and are
covered by the exclusions in G.S. 122C-22(a)(10).
…
(f) Fees. – A person who has a substance abuse assessment conducted for the purpose of
obtaining a certificate of completion shall pay to the assessing agency a fee of one hundred dollars
($100). A person shall pay to a school a fee of one hundred sixty dollars ($160.00). A person
shall pay to a treatment facility a fee of seventy-five dollars ($75.00). If the defendant is treated
by an area mental health facility, G.S. 122C-146 applies after receipt of the seventy-five dollar
($75.00) fee.
A facility that provides to a person who is required to obtain a certificate of completion a
substance abuse assessment, an ADET school, or a substance abuse treatment program may
require the person to pay a fee required by this subsection before it issues a certificate of
completion. As stated in G.S. 122C-146, however, an area facility may not deny a service to a
person because the person is unable to pay.
A facility shall remit to the Department ten percent (10%) of each fee paid to the facility
under this subsection by a person who attends an ADET school conducted by the facility. The
Department may use amounts remitted to it under this subsection only to support, evaluate, and
administer ADET schools.
Substance abuse services provided by the Department of Adult Correction shall not charge a
fee to the individual or require a fee to be paid to the Department. The Department of Adult
Correction shall be responsible for any costs associated with purchasing required curriculum
materials.
…."
SECTION 2.3.(c) G.S. 143B-1455 is amended by adding a new subsection to read:
"(g) The Program may provide substance abuse assessments and alcohol and drug
education traffic (ADET) school to eligible individuals housed in a facility operated by the
Department of Adult Correction, consistent with the applicable State laws, Administrative Code
provisions, and prison policy."
PART III. OFFICE OF STAFF DEVELOPMENT AND TRAINING (OSDT)
VESTED PROBATION AND PAROLE OFFICERS MAINTAIN ELIGIBILITY FOR
SUPPLEMENTAL RETIREMENT WHEN SERVING IN CERTAIN ROLES
SECTION 3.1.(a) G.S. 135-1(17a) reads as rewritten:
"(17a) "Probation/Parole Officer" shall mean a full-time paid employee of the
Division of Community Supervision and Reentry of the Department of Adult
Correction whose duties include supervising, evaluating, or otherwise
instructing offenders who have been placed on probation, parole, or
post-release supervision or have been assigned to any other community-based
program operated by the Division of Community Supervision and
Page 6 Session Law 2026-44 Senate Bill 355

Reentry.Reentry, or a full-time paid employee of the Department of Adult
Correction's Office of Staff Development and Training who is certified as a
Probation/Parole Officer and works exclusively in a training role."
SECTION 3.1.(b) This section is effective when it becomes law and applies to
determinations under Article 1 of Chapter 135 of the General Statutes made on or after that date.
PART IV. REDUCE MEETING REQUIREMENT OF STATE REENTRY COUNCIL
COLLABORATIVE
SECTION 4.1. G.S. 143B-1484(b) reads as rewritten:
"(b) The Secretary, or the Secretary's designee, shall chair the SRCC which shall meet at
least quarterly annually upon the call of the chair. The SRCC shall study the needs of
ex-offenders who have been recently released from a correctional institution and to increase the
effectiveness of local reentry councils."
PART V. TECHNICAL CORRECTIONS
POST-RELEASE SUPERVISION ELIGIBILITY AND PROCEDURE
SECTION 5.1.(a) G.S. 15A-1368.2(c1) reads as rewritten:
"(c1) Notwithstanding subsection (c) of this section, a person required to submit to
satellite-based monitoring pursuant to G.S. 15A-1368.4(b1)(6) shall continue to participate in
satellite-based monitoring beyond the period of post-release supervision until the Commission
superior court in the county where the conviction occurred releases the person from that
requirement pursuant to G.S. 14-208.43."
SECTION 5.1.(b) This section is effective when it becomes law and applies to
satellite-based monitoring releases ordered on or after that date.
EXCLUDE DEPARTMENT OF ADULT CORRECTION INVESTIGATIONS FROM
CERTAIN INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY RESTRICTIONS
SECTION 5.2.(a) G.S. 143-805(d) reads as rewritten:
"(d) Subsections (a) and (b) of this section shall not apply to an official or employee that
is engaged in any of the following activities in the course of that official's or employee's official
duties:
…
(8) Investigating matters involving offenders incarcerated with, or otherwise
under the supervision of, the Department of Adult Correction or matters
related to the misuse of devices owned by the Department of Adult
Correction."
SECTION 5.2.(b) This section is effective when it becomes law and applies to
investigations occurring before, on, or after that date.
CLARIFY PROBATION AND PAROLE RECORDS ACCESS FOR CHEROKEE AND
CATAWBA MARSHALS SERVICES
SECTION 5.3. G.S. 1E-20 reads as rewritten:
"§ 1E-20. Cherokee and Catawba Marshals Services.
…
(c) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, marshals of the Cherokee Marshals
Service shall have access to all probation and parole records of the North Carolina Department
of Public Safety Adult Correction to the same extent as a probation or post-release supervision
officer of the Department for any person over which the Cherokee Tribal Courts have jurisdiction
to proceed in a criminal case and impose a sentence, including a fine, community service, or
Senate Bill 355 Session Law 2026-44 Page 7

imprisonment. The Department may enter into a memorandum of understanding addressing the
specifics of transferring information to the Cherokee Tribal Courts.
…
(f) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, Marshals of the Catawba Indian Nation
shall have access to all probation and parole records of the North Carolina Department of Public
Safety Adult Correction to the same extent as a probation or post-release supervision officer of
the Department for any person with the Catawba Nation Tribal Courts have jurisdiction to
proceed in a criminal case and impose a sentence, including a fine, community service, or
imprisonment. The Department may enter into a memorandum of understanding addressing the
specifics of transferring information to the Catawba Nation Tribal Courts."
PART VI. SEVERABILITY AND EFFECTIVE DATE
SEVERABILITY CLAUSE
SECTION 6.1. If any part, section, or provision of this act is declared
unconstitutional or invalid by the courts, it does not affect the validity of this act as a whole or
any part other than the part declared to be unconstitutional or invalid.
EFFECTIVE DATE
SECTION 6.2. Except as otherwise provided, this act is effective when it becomes
law.
In the General Assembly read three times and ratified this the 2nd day of July, 2026.
s/ Phil Berger
President Pro Tempore of the Senate
s/ John R. Bell, IV
Presiding Officer of the House of Representatives
s/ Josh Stein
Governor
Approved 9:44 a.m. this 7th day of July, 2026
Page 8 Session Law 2026-44 Senate Bill 355